Utah statutes.
41-6a-1501.   Motorcycle or motor-driven cycle -- Place for operator to ride
-- Passengers.
(1)  A person operating a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle shall ride only on
the permanent and regular seat attached to the motorcycle or motor-driven
cycle.
(2) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(b):
(i)  a person operating a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle may not carry any
other person on the motorcycle or motor-driven cycle; and
(ii)  a passenger may not ride on a motorcycle or a motor-driven cycle.
(b)  If a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle is designed to carry more than one
person, a passenger may ride on:
(i)  the permanent and regular seat, if designed for two persons; or
(ii)  another seat firmly attached to the motorcycle or motor-driven cycle at
the rear or side of the operator.
(3)  A person shall ride on a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle only while
sitting astride the seat, facing forward, with one leg on either side of the
motorcycle or motor-driven cycle.
(4)  A person may not operate a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle while
carrying a package, bundle, or other article which prevents the person from
keeping both hands on the handlebars.
(5)  An operator of a motorcycle or motor-driven cycle may not carry a person
and a person may not ride in a position that interferes with:
(a)  the operation or control of the motorcycle or motor-driven cycle; or
(b)   the view of the operator.
